Colorado, session 2026A, HB1349.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-3-206, add
(1)(a.5) and (5) as follows:
26.5-3-206. Colorado child abuse prevention trust fund -
creation - source of funds - appropriation - report - repeal.
(1) There is created in the state treasury the Colorado child abuse
prevention trust fund. The board shall administer the trust fund, which
consists of:
(a.5) (I) MONEY TRANSFERRED TO THE TRUST FUND IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SECTION 26.5-3-507 (2)(c)(III).
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(a.5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2030.
(5) (a) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1, 2029, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
REPORT TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON
THE EFFECT OF THE TRANSFERS FROM THE NURSE HOME VISITOR PROGRAM
FUND CREATED IN SECTION 26.5-3-507 (2)(c) TO THE TRUST FUND. THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE AN ACCOUNTING OF ANY ADDITIONAL
REIMBURSEMENT MONEY RECEIVED FOR PREVENTION SERVICES AND
PROGRAMS IDENTIFIED IN THE FEDERAL TITLE IV-E PREVENTION SERVICES
CLEARINGHOUSE PURSUANT TO THE FEDERAL "FAMILY FIRST PREVENTION
SERVICES ACT OF 2018" IN ITS REPORT.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2030.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-3-208, amend (1)
as follows:
26.5-3-208. Report - repeal.
(1) (a) The department shall contract for an independent evaluation
of the Colorado child abuse prevention trust fund created in section
26.5-3-206, as it existed prior to its repeal on July 1, 2027, including
administrative costs of operating the trust fund and the cost-effectiveness
and the impact of the grants on reducing and preventing child abuse. The
department shall provide a report of the evaluation to the house of
representatives and senate health and human services committees, or any
successor committees, on or before November 1, 2029.
(b) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2030.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 26.5-3-209 as
follows:
26.5-3-209. Repeal of part.
(1) Sections 26.5-3-201 to 26.5-3-207 are repealed, effective July
1, 2027.
(2) Section 26.5-3-208 and this section are repealed, effective July
1, 2030.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1349

SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-3-503, add (1.5)
as follows:
26.5-3-503. Definitions.
As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1.5) "FUND" MEANS THE NURSE HOME VISITOR PROGRAM FUND
CREATED IN SECTION 26.5-3-507 (2)(c).
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-3-507, amend
(2)(c)(I); repeal (2)(d); and add (2)(c)(III) as follows:
26.5-3-507. Selection of entities to administer the program -
grants - nurse home visitor program fund - created - report - repeal.
(2) (c) (I) Grants awarded pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this
section are payable from the nurse home visitor program fund, which fund
is created in the state treasury. The nurse home visitor program fund
referred to in this section as the "fund", is administered by the department
and consists of money transferred to the fund by the state treasurer from
money received pursuant to the master settlement agreement in the amount
described in subsection (2)(e) of this section AND ANY OTHER MONEY THAT
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO THE FUND. In
addition, the state treasurer shall credit to the fund any public or private
gifts, grants, or donations received by the department to implement the
program, including any money received from the United States federal
government for the program. The fund is subject to annual appropriation by
the general assembly to the department for grants to entities for operation
of the program. The department may retain the amount needed to pay for the
program's share of the department's indirect costs, as calculated under the
federally approved cost allocation plan. In addition, the department may
retain a total of up to five percent of the amount annually appropriated from
the fund for the program, in order to compensate the health sciences facility
pursuant to section 26.5-3-505 (4), as set forth in the scope of work in the
agreement between the department and the health sciences facility, and to
compensate the department for the actual costs the department incurs in
implementing subsection (2)(b) of this section, as determined by the
department; except that the portion of the costs to compensate the
department for implementing subsection (2)(b) of this section must not
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1349

exceed two percent of the amount annually appropriated from the fund for
the program, and the portion of such costs to compensate the health sciences
facility pursuant to section 26.5-3-505 (4), as set forth in the scope of work
in the contract between the department and the health sciences facility, must
not exceed three percent of the amount annually appropriated from the fund
for the program. In addition, if the total amount annually appropriated from
the fund for the program exceeds nineteen million dollars, the department
and the health sciences facility shall assess whether a smaller percentage of
the appropriated funds exceeding nineteen million dollars is adequate to
cover their actual costs and shall jointly submit to the general assembly a
report articulating their conclusions on this subject. The actual costs of the
department include department personnel and operating costs and any
necessary transfers to the department of health care policy and financing for
administrative costs incurred for the medicaid program associated with the
program. The actual costs of the health sciences facility include the facility's
own actual program costs and those of its contractors and subcontractors.
Any costs for time studies required to obtain medicaid reimbursement for
the program may be paid from program funds and are not subject to the five
percent limit in this section. Notwithstanding section 24-36-114, all interest
derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund must be
credited to the fund. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(c)(II)
SUBSECTIONS (2)(c)(II) AND (2)(c)(III) of this section, all unexpended and
unencumbered money in the fund at the end of any fiscal year remains in the
fund and must not be transferred to the general fund or any other fund.
(III) (A) ON JULY 1, 2026, AND ON EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER
THROUGH JULY 1, 2029, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER FIVE
MILLION ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE
COLORADO CHILD ABUSE PREVENTION TRUST FUND CREATED IN SECTION
26.5-3-206.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(c)(III) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2030.
(d) It is the intent of the general assembly that general fund money
not be appropriated for implementation of the program.
SECTION 6. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this
act, appropriations made in the annual general appropriation act for the
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1349

2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of early childhood for use by
community and family support are adjusted as follows:
(a) The cash fund appropriation from the nurse home visitor
program fund created in section 26.5-3-507 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., for home
visiting is decreased by $5,100,000;
(b) The general fund appropriation for home visiting is increased by
$5,100,000;
(c) The general fund appropriation for child maltreatment prevention
is decreased by $5,100,000; and
(d) The cash fund appropriation from the Colorado child abuse
prevention trust fund created in section 26.5-3-206 (1), C.R.S., for child
maltreatment prevention is increased by $5,100,000.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of appropriation from the nurse home visitor
program fund created in section 26.5-3-507 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., made in the
annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the
department of early childhood for use by the community and family support
for home visiting is less than the amount of the adjustments required in
subsection (1)(a) of this section;
(b) The amount of general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of early childhood for use by community and family support for child
maltreatment prevention is less than the amount of adjustments required in
subsection (1)(c) of this section;
(c) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of early childhood
for use by community and family support for home visiting; or
(d) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of early childhood
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1349

for use by community and family support for child maltreatment prevention.
SECTION 7. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 6 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 6 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual
general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 8. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1349

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1349